Mississippi, session 2026, SB2787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Applicability. This act applies to a facility of a public elementary or secondary school, including a charter school, or a private elementary or secondary school, inclusive of all buildings and structures located on the school grounds where liquefied petroleum gas is used or piped.  This act does not apply to a home school. SECTION 2.  Definitions. For the purposes of this act, the definitions ascribed to terms in Section 75-57-5 are also applicable to this act. SECTION 3.  Duty to Pressure Test.  (1)  A person responsible for a school facility shall perform an annual pressure test on the liquefied petroleum gas piping system in the school facility.  The test must be performed and results reported to the facility's liquefied petroleum gas distributor before the beginning of the school year each academic year. (2)  If the person responsible for one or more school facilities operates the facilities on a year-round calendar, the pressure test in each of those facilities must be conducted by the facility's liquefied petroleum gas distributor not later than July 1 of the year in which the pressure test is performed. If the pressure test is performed by some other qualified person not affiliated with the distributor, then the results of the test must be reported to the distributor not later than July 1 of the year in which the pressure test is performed. (3)  A liquefied petroleum gas piping pressure test shall be performed in accordance with the requirements of the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 54 (National Fuel Gas Code) and the rules and regulations as may be issued by the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board. SECTION 4.  Requirements of the Test.  (1)  The person responsible for a school facility shall have a pressure test performed by a liquefied petroleum gas distributor authorized to operate in this state, or by a person qualified to install, alter, or repair a liquefied compressed gas system, who has an appropriate permit to perform such activity issued by the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board pursuant to the provisions of Section 75-57-1 et seq. The testing shall be sufficient to determine whether the liquefied petroleum gas piping downstream of the school facility's liquefied petroleum gas tank holds at least normal operating pressure over a specified period determined by the applicable codes, rules and regulations. (2)  During the pressure test, each system supply inlet and outlet in the school facility must be closed. (3)  At the request of a person responsible for a school facility, the Liquefied Compressed Gas Division of the Mississippi Insurance Department shall assist the person in developing a procedure for conducting a test. SECTION 5.  Notice of Test.  (1)  A person responsible for a school facility shall provide written notice to the school's liquefied petroleum gas distributor specifying the date and result of each pressure test or other inspection. (2)  The liquefied petroleum gas distributor shall maintain a copy of the notice until at least the first anniversary of the date on which the supplier received the notice. SECTION 6.  Discontinuance of Service.  (1)  A distributer shall discontinue service to a school facility if: (a)  The distributor receives official notification from the firm or individual conducting the test of a hazardous liquefied petroleum gas leakage in the facility piping system; or (b)  A test or other inspection at the facility is not performed as required by this article. (2)  Once service has been discontinued, the liquefied petroleum gas distributor shall not resupply gas to the system until the leak has been repaired by a qualified installer, or a subsequent test verifies the piping system is safe for service. (3)  A distributor is not liable for any damages that result from a failure to discontinue service as required by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) for a facility other than a school district facility. SECTION 7.  Report of Leakage.  (1)  The results of the annual pressure test in any facility of a public elementary or secondary school, including a charter school, or any school accredited by the State Board of Education, must be reported to the State Department of Education within thirty (30) days of the testing. (2)  An identified liquefied petroleum gas leakage in a school district facility in the performance of the required testing must be reported by the firm or individual conducting the test to the board of trustees of the district in which the facility is located, as well as the State Department of Education.  An identified liquefied petroleum gas leakage in the performance of the required testing in another school facility must be reported by the firm or individual conducting the test to the person responsible for the school facility. SECTION 8.  Rules and Enforcement.  The State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance, is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary or appropriate to implement the requirements of this act. SECTION 9.  Sections 1 through 8 of this act shall be codified in Title 75, Chapter 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, as a new Article 3 entitled "Testing of Liquefied Petroleum Gas Piping Systems in School Facilities." SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.